District of Columbia statutes.
46-705

Repealed

Remedies of a state furnishing support or institutional care.

Repealed.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 286, Pub. L. 85-94, § 5
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748
1981 Ed., § 30-305.
1973 Ed., § 30-305.